District of Columbia statutes.
3-2301.04

Repealed

Application for examination and registration; fee; qualifications; registration of training schools

Repealed.

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-99, § 1104(b), 33 DCR 729
1981 Ed., §§ 2-1701.1 to 2-1701.10.